District of Columbia statutes.
38-1802.14a

Charter schools admissions task force.

(a)

There is established a task force that shall study providing a neighborhood preference in charter school admissions for the 2013-2014 school year. The task force shall consist of:

(1)

The following 5 government officials, or their designees:

(A)

Chairman of the Public Charter School Board;

(B)

Chairman of the Council of the District of Columbia;

(C)

State Superintendent of Education;

(D)

Deputy Mayor for Education; and

(E)

Chancellor of the District of Columbia Public Schools; and

(2)

The following nongovernment members:

(A)

Two representatives from charter support organizations;

(B)

A representative from the education department of a national research organization;

(C)

A representative from a national charter school organization;

(D)

Two charter school leaders selected by the Public Charter School Board Chair; and

(E)

A labor representative.

(b)

The task force shall:

(1)

Be chaired by the Chairman of the Public Charter School Board, or his or her designee;

(2)

Meet at an agreed to location as often as determined necessary by the Chairman of the task force;

(3)

Explore the feasibility of offering a neighborhood preference in charter school admissions for the 2013-2014 school year; and

(4)

By September 1, 2012, submit a report to the Council of its findings, which shall include:

(A)

Consideration of the various ways in which a neighborhood preference can be designed, including:

(i)

The pros and cons of a weighted lottery;

(ii)

Setting aside of a certain percentage of new seats;

(iii)

A geographically limited preference; and

(iv)

A preference based on rankings in a city-wide application process;

(B)

A definition of neighborhood for the purpose of setting boundaries in admissions;

(C)

An examination of models that are being used in other jurisdictions and evaluation of their applicability to the District; and

(D)

Recommendations based on its findings.

History

Apr. 26, 1996, 110 Stat. 1321 [251], Pub. L. 104-134, § 2214a
as added Sept. 20, 2012, D.C. Law 19-168, § 4052, 59 DCR 8025

Effect of Amendments

The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-168 added this section.

Temporary Legislation

Section 2 of D.C. Law 19-202 amended Section 2214a(a)(4) of the District of Columbia School Reform Act of 1995, approved April 26, 1996 (110 Stat. 1321; to be codified at D.C. Official Code § 38-1802.14a(a)(4)), by striking the phrase “September 1, 2012,” and inserting the phrase “December 15, 2012,” in its place.
Section 4(b) of D.C. Law 19-202 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary addition of section, see § 4052 of the Fiscal Year 2013 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-413, July 25, 2012, 59 DCR 9290).